turkish.lexc
LEXICON VerbAgrAor_VHO
+1sg:um     #;
+2sg:sun    #;
+3sg:0      #;
+1pl:uz     #;
+2pl:sunuz  #;
+3pl:lar    #;

! ============================================================
! FRONT ROUNDED VERBS (gör, gül)
! ============================================================

LEXICON VerbVHU
+Neg:0              VerbTAM_VHU_Neg;
+Pass:ül            VerbTAM_VHU;
+Caus:dür           VerbTAM_VHU;
0                   VerbTAM_VHU;

LEXICON VerbTAM_VHU
+Pres:üyor          VerbAgrPres;
+Past:dü            VerbAgrPast_VHU;
+Past+Evid:müş      VerbAgrPast_VHU;
+Fut:ecek           VerbAgrFut_VHE;
+Fut:eceğ           VerbAgrFut_VHE_V;
+Cond:se            VerbAgrCond_VHE;
+Nec:meli           VerbAgrNec_VHE;
+Aor:ür             VerbAgrAor_VHU;
+Inf:mek            #;
+VN:me              #;
+Imp:0              VerbAgrImp_VHU;

LEXICON VerbTAM_VHU_Neg
+Pres:müyor         VerbAgrPres;
+Past:medi          VerbAgrPast_VHU;

LEXICON VerbAgrPast_VHU
+1sg:m      #;
+2sg:n      #;
+3sg:0      #;
+1pl:k      #;
+2pl:nüz    #;
+3pl:ler    #;

LEXICON VerbAgrAor_VHU
+1sg:üm     #;
+2sg:sün    #;
+3sg:0      #;
+1pl:üz     #;
+2pl:sünüz  #;
+3pl:ler    #;

LEXICON VerbAgrImp_VHU
+2sg:0      #;
+2pl:ün     #;
+3sg:sün    #;
+3pl:sünler #;

! ============================================================
! ADJECTIVES
! ============================================================

LEXICON Adjectives
    AdjRoots;

LEXICON AdjRoots
güzel+Adj:güzel     AdjCopVHE;
! büyük: k-final before consonant suffix (büyüktür), no alternation needed
büyük+Adj:büyük     AdjCopVHU;

LEXICON AdjCopVHE
+CopPres+1sg:im     #;
+CopPres+2sg:sin    #;
+CopPres+3sg:dir    #;
+CopPast+1sg:dim    #;
+CopPast+2sg:din    #;
+CopPast+3sg:di     #;

! FIX: büyük+tür - k is voiceless, dir->tür after k
LEXICON AdjCopVHU
+CopPres+1sg:yüm    #;
+CopPres+2sg:sün    #;
+CopPres+3sg:tür    #;
+CopPast+1sg:düm    #;
+CopPast+2sg:dün    #;
+CopPast+3sg:dü     #;

END
